Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Registration and Practice.

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing of architects, engineers, and land surveyors, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

For code of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 36, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

Practice of architecture by corporation as affected by license regulations. 56 ALR2d 726.

What amounts to architectural or engineering services within license requirements. 82 ALR2d 1013.

Sec. 08.48.171.
General requirements and qualifications for registration.

An applicant for registration as an architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect must be of good character and reputation and shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board of the applicant’s education, training, and experience. However, an applicant for registration as a land surveyor may not be required to submit evidence of more than eight years of any combination of education, experience, or training.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 72 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.180.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.181.
Registration upon examination.

Except as provided in
AS

08.48.191

, for registration as a professional architect, professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or professional landscape architect, a person shall be examined in this state in accordance with the regulations of procedure and standards adopted by the board under
AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). The procedure and standards shall at least meet the requirements adopted by recognized national examining councils for these professions.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.190.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.191.
Registration by comity or endorsement.

A person holding a certificate of registration authorizing the person to practice architecture in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country, or holding a certificate of qualification issued by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards, that, in the opinion of the board, meets the requirements of this chapter, based on verified evidence, may, upon application, be registered in accordance with the regulations of the board.

A person holding a certificate of registration authorizing the person to practice engineering in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country, that, in the opinion of the board meets the requirements of this chapter, based on verified evidence, may, upon application, be registered in accordance with regulations of the board.

A person holding a certificate of registration authorizing the person to practice land surveying in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country, may, upon application, be registered in accordance with the regulations of the board if the person’s certificate was issued under requirements comparable to those in this state.

A person holding a certificate of registration authorizing the person to practice landscape architecture in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country, that in the opinion of the board meets the requirements of this chapter, based on verified evidence, may upon application, be registered under the regulations of the board. A person holding a certificate of qualification issued by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards may upon application be registered under regulations of the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.200.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.201.
Application for registration.

Application for registration as a professional architect, a professional engineer, a professional land surveyor, or a professional landscape architect shall

be on a form prescribed and furnished by the board;

contain statements made under oath, showing the applicant’s education and a detailed summary of the applicant’s technical experience; and

contain five references, three of whom must be architects for architectural registration, engineers for engineering registration, land surveyors for land surveying registration, and landscape architects for landscape architectural registration, having personal knowledge of the applicant’s architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural education, training, or experience.

[Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 9 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.210.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.211.
Certificate of registration.

An applicant who fulfills the requirements set out by the board shall be awarded a certificate of registration as a professional architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect, authorizing the holder to offer or perform architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services or work for the public, or to certify or sign architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural documents. Certificates of registration issued under this section shall be inscribed on their face in a manner determined by the board.

The certificate of registration sealed by the board is prima facie evidence that the person named in it is entitled to all rights and privileges of a professional architect, professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or professional landscape architect while the certificate remains unrevoked or unexpired.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.48.215.
Retired status registration.

On retiring from practice and payment of an appropriate one-time fee, an individual who is a registrant in good standing with the board may apply for the conversion of a certificate of registration to a retired status registration. An individual holding a retired status registration may not practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture in the state. A retired status registration is valid for the life of the registration holder and does not require renewal.

An individual with a retired status registration may apply for a certificate of registration. Before issuing a certificate of registration under this subsection, the board may require the applicant to meet reasonable criteria as determined under regulations of the board. The criteria may include submission of continuing education credits and reexamination requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 69 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 47 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.220.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.221.
Seals.

Each registrant may obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board, bearing the registrant’s name, registration number, and the legend “Registered Professional Architect,” “Registered Professional Engineer,” “Registered Professional Land Surveyor,” or “Registered Professional Landscape Architect,” as appropriate. When a registrant issues final drawings, specifications, surveys, plats, plates, reports, or similar documents, the registrant shall stamp the documents with the seal and sign the seal. The board shall adopt regulations governing the use of seals by the registrant. An architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect may not affix or permit a seal and signature to be affixed to an instrument after the expiration of a certificate or for the purpose of aiding or abetting another person to evade or attempt to evade a provision of this chapter. The registrant, by affixing the registrant’s seal to final drawings, specifications, surveys, plats, plates, reports, or similar documents, and by signing the seal, certifies that the documents were prepared by or under the registrant’s direct supervision, are within the registrant’s field of practice, or constitute design work of minor importance.

Final drawings, specifications, surveys, plats, plates, reports, or similar documents containing the work of multiple fields of practice shall be sealed and signed by a registrant in each field of practice covered by the document. The registrant shall certify on the face of the document the extent of the registrant’s responsibility for all work prepared under the registrant’s seal. When certifying design work of minor importance, the registrant shall identify that work on the document near the registrant’s seal and take responsibility for all work prepared under the registrant’s seal.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 72 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1995; am § 12 ch 47 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 65 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 6, 2014, in (a), rewrote the second sentence, which substituted “the registrant shall stamp the documents with the seal and sign the seal” for “the registrant shall sign the documents and stamp the documents with the seal” at the end, rewrote the fifth sentence, which read, “The registrant, by affixing the registrant’s seal to final drawings, specifications, surveys, plats, plates, reports, and other similar documents, and signing them, certifies that these documents were prepared by or under the registrant’s direct supervision, unless the registrant certifies on the face of the document to the extent of the registrant’s responsibility”; added (b).

Sec. 08.48.230.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.231.
Expirations and renewals.

To remain valid, certificates shall be renewed in accordance with AS

08.01.100

. Notice of renewal dates, given under AS

08.01.050(a)(11)

, shall be mailed to the registrant, corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership at the registrant’s, corporation’s, limited liability company’s, or limited liability partnership’s last known address at least one month in advance of the date of the expiration of the certificate. If the certificate has been suspended or revoked, the board may take action independent of this section.

The renewal of a certificate does not require reapplication if the certificate has not expired or has not been suspended or revoked.

An expired certificate may be renewed under regulations adopted by the board establishing requirements for reexamination.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am §§ 28, 29 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.240.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.241.
Corporations, limited liability companies, and limited liability partnerships.

This chapter does not prevent a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership from offering architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services; however, the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership shall file with the board

an application for a certificate of authorization upon a form to be prescribed by the board and containing information required to enable the board to determine whether the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to offer to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture in this state;

a certified copy of a resolution of the board of directors of the corporation, the managing members or manager of the limited liability company, or the general partners of a limited liability partnership designating persons holding certificates of registration under this chapter as responsible for the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture by the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership in this state and providing that full authority to make all final architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural decisions on behalf of the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership with respect to work performed by the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership in this state is granted by the board of directors of the corporation, the managing members or manager of the limited liability company, or the general partners of the limited liability partnership to the persons designated in the resolution; however, the filing of this resolution does not relieve the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership of any responsibility or liability imposed upon it by law or by contract;

a designation in writing setting out the name of one or more persons holding certificates of registration under this chapter who are in responsible charge of each major branch of the architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural activities in which the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership specializes in this state; if a change is made in the person in responsible charge of a major branch of the architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural activities, the change shall be designated in writing and filed with the board within 30 days after the effective date of the change.

Upon filing with the board the application for certificate of authorization, certified copy of resolution, affidavit, and designation of persons specified in this section, the board shall, subject to (c) of this section, issue to the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership a certificate of authorization to practice architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture in this state upon a determination by the board that

the bylaws of the corporation, the articles of organization or operating agreement of the limited liability company, or the partnership agreement of the limited liability partnership contain provisions that all architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural decisions pertaining to architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural activities in this state will be made by the specified architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect in responsible charge, or other registered architects, engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects under the direction or supervision of the architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect in responsible charge;

the application for certificate of authorization states the type of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture practiced or to be practiced by the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership;

the applicant corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership has the ability to provide architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services;

the application for certificate of authorization states the professional records of the designated person who is in responsible charge of each major branch of architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural activities in which the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership specializes;

the application for certificate of authorization states the experience, if any, of the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership in furnishing architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services during the preceding five-year period;

the applicant corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership meets other requirements related to professional competence in the furnishing of architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services as may be adopted by the board in furtherance of the objectives and provisions of this chapter.

The board may, in the exercise of its discretion, refuse to issue, or may suspend or revoke a certificate of authorization to a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership if the board finds that any of the corporation’s officers, directors, or incorporators, any of the stockholders holding a majority of the stock of the corporation, any of the limited liability company’s organizers, managers, or managing members, or any of the limited liability partnership’s general partners has committed misconduct or malpractice, or has been found personally responsible for misconduct or malpractice under the provisions of this chapter.

The certificate of authorization must specify the major branches of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture of which the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership has designated a person in responsible charge as provided in this section. The certificate of authorization shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership, together with the names of persons designated as being in responsible charge of the professional activities.

If a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership that is organized solely by either a group of architects, a group of engineers, a group of land surveyors, or a group of landscape architects, each holding a certificate of registration under this chapter, applies for a certificate of authorization, the board may, in its discretion, grant a certificate of authorization to the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership based on a review of the professional records of the incorporators of the corporation, organizers of the limited liability company, or partners who formed the limited liability partnership in place of the required qualifications set out in this section. If the ownership of the corporation is altered, the membership of the limited liability company is altered, or the partners of the limited liability partnership change, the corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership shall apply for a revised certificate of authorization, based upon the professional records of the owners of the corporation, the members of the limited liability company, or the partners of the limited liability partnership, if exclusively architects, engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects, or otherwise under the qualifications required by (b)(1) — (4) of this section.

A corporation, limited liability company, or a limited liability partnership authorized to offer architectural, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architectural services under this chapter, together with its directors, officers, managing members, manager, and partners for their own individual acts, is responsible to the same degree as the designated individual registered architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect, and shall conduct its business without misconduct or malpractice in the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture as defined in this chapter.

If the board, after a proper hearing, finds that a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership holding a certificate of authorization has committed misconduct or malpractice, the board shall suspend or revoke the certificate of authorization. The board shall also suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of any registered individual architect, engineer, land surveyor, or landscape architect who, after a proper hearing, is found by the board to have participated in committing the misconduct or malpractice.

Drawings, specifications, designs, and reports, when issued in connection with work performed by a corporation, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership under its certificate of authorization, shall be prepared by or under the responsible charge of and shall be signed by and stamped with the official seal of a person holding a certificate of registration under this chapter.

[Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

In this section,

“manager” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

;

“managing member” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 2 SLA 1990; am §§ 13 — 18 ch 47 SLA 1998; am §§ 4, 5 ch 38 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Sec. 08.48.250.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.251.
Certain partnerships.

This chapter does not prevent the practice of architecture, engineering, land surveying, or landscape architecture by a partnership if all of the members of the partnership are architects, engineers, land surveyors, or landscape architects legally registered under this chapter. In this section, “partnership” does not include a limited liability partnership.

History.

(§ 3 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 19 ch 47 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 38 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.48.255.
Teachers. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 08.48.260.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 08.48.261.
State employees. [Repealed, § 9 ch 2 SLA 1990. For transitional provisions relating to registration requirements of state employees, see § 10, ch. 2, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.]

Sec. 08.48.265.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for examinations, registrations, certificates of authorization, and renewals of a certificate.

History.

(§ 30 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 26 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, substituted “department” for “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.”

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

Secs. 08.48.270 — 08.48.280.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 179 SLA 1972.]